Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Departments Generally

6-21-301. Departments of city.

That the work and affairs of the city may be classified and arranged conveniently and conducted efficiently, there are hereby established the following departments:

Department of education;

Department of finance;

Department of public safety; and

Department of public works and welfare.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 17, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a224; Code 1932, § 3622; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2111.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-21-302. Creation and control of departments by board.

The board of commissioners may by ordinance create new departments or combine or abolish existing departments and prescribe their duties and functions, but before doing so must receive the written recommendations of the city manager.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 17, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a225; Code 1932, § 3623; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2112; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 13.

6-21-303. Supervision of departments by manager.

The city manager shall supervise and control all departments now or hereafter created, except as otherwise provided by this charter.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 17, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a226; Code 1932, § 3624; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2113.